en: Soft fruit cakes
fr: Gâteaux moelleux aux fruits

en: Lemon cake
de: Zitronenkuchen
fr: Gâteau au citron
hr: Kolač od limuna
ja: レモンケーキ

en: Financiers
xx: Financiers
fr: Financiers, financier, visitandines, visitandine, financiers aux amandes, financier aux amandes
ja: フィナンシェ

en: Mooncake
fr: Gâteau de lune

en: Frozen Tangyuan
fr: Tangyuan surgelés

en: Christmas Puddings
de: Weihnachtspuddings
fr: Puddings de Noël, Pudding de Noël
hr: Božićni puding
ja: クリスマスプディング
nl: Kerstmispuddings

en: Rice puddings, Refrigerated rice puddings
de: Milchreisbrei, Milchreis, Reisbrei
es: Arroz con leche
fi: riisivanukkaat
fr: Riz au lait, Riz au lait rayon frais
hr: Puding od riže
it: Pudding di riso, Budino di riso
ja: ライスプディング
lt: Ryžių pudingai, atšaldyti ryžių pudingai
nl: Rijstepaps
pl: Puddingi ryżowe
tr: Sütlaç

en: Rice pudding with caramel sauce
fr: Gâteau de riz au caramel, Gâteaux de riz sur lit de caramel, Gâteaux de riz nappage caramel

en: Refrigerated rice pudding with caramel sauce
fr: Gâteau de riz au caramel rayon frais

en: Canned rice puddings
fr: Gâteaux de riz en conserve, Gâteaux de riz appertisés

en: Vanilla flavored rice pudding
de: Vanillemilchreis
fi: vaniljan makuinen riisivanukas
fr: Riz au lait saveur vanille
hr: Puding od riže s okusom vanilije
lt: Vaniliniai ryžių pudingai
nl: Rijstpudding met vanille

en: Plain rice puddings
fr: Riz au lait nature

en: Rice puddings with a fruit preparation
fr: Riz au lait à la préparation de fruits

en: Cat tongue, Cat's tongue cookie, Cat's tongue biscuit
de: Katzenzungen
es: Lenguas de gato
fr: Langues de chat, Langue de chat
hr: Mačji jezik
it: Lingue di gatto
nl: Kattetongen

en: Cigarette Russes, Russian cigarettes
fr: Biscuits cigarettes, cigarette russe, Cigarettes russes

en: Madeleines, Madeleines cakes, Madeleine biscuit
xx: Madeleines
ca: Magdalenes
de: Madeleine
es: Magdalenas
fi: Madeleine-leivokset
fr: Madeleines, Madeleine ordinaire
hr: Madeleines
it: Madeleine
ja: マドレーヌ
nl: Madeleines
pt: Madalenas

en: Plain madeleines, Plain madeleines cakes
fr: Madeleines natures, Madeleine traditionnelle pur beurre

en: Madeleines with raisin, Raisin madeleines
da: Madeleinekager med rosiner
de: Madeleines mit Rosinen
fr: Madeleines aux raisins, Madeleines au raisin, Madeleine aux raisins, Madeleine au raisin
hr: Madeleine s grožđicama
nl: Madeleines met rozijnen
sv: Madeleinekakor med russin

en: Long madeleines
de: Lange Madeleines
fr: Madeleines longues
hr: Duge madeleine

en: Chocolate madeleines
de: Madeleines mit Schokolade
fi: Suklaiset Madeleine-leivokset
fr: Madeleines au chocolat
hr: Čokoladni madeleines
it: Madeleine al cioccolato
nl: Chocolade madeleines